Utah statutes.
77-37-1.   Legislative intent.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes the duty of victims and witnesses of crime to fully and voluntarily cooperate with law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies, the essential nature of citizen cooperation to state and local law enforcement efforts, and the general effectiveness and well-being of the criminal justice system of this state.  In this chapter, the Legislature declares its intent to ensure that all victims and witnesses of crime are treated with dignity, respect, courtesy, and sensitivity, and that the rights extended in this chapter to victims and witnesses of crime are honored and protected by law in a manner no less vigorous than protections afforded criminal defendants.

(2)  The Legislature finds it is necessary to provide child victims and child witnesses with additional consideration and different treatment than that usually afforded to adults.  The treatment should ensure that children's participation in the criminal justice process be conducted in the most effective and least traumatic, intrusive, or intimidating manner.



Enacted by Chapter 194, 1987 General Session

